examples/example.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
  <sdef n="n"/>
  <sdef n="vblex"/>
  <sdef n="adv"/>
  <sdef n="pr"/>
  <sdef n="det"/>
  <sdef n="adj"/>
  </sdefs>
 
  <!-- <a/> stands for one or more tags -->
  <!-- <j/> stands for word boundary -->

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="SN">
      <!-- n.* -->
      <e><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="n"/><a/><j/></i></e>
      <!-- det.* n.* -->
      <e><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="det"/><a/><j/></i><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="n"/><a/><j/></i></e>
      <!-- adj n.* -->
      <e><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="adj"/><j/></i><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="n"/><a/><j/></i></e>
      <!-- det.* adj n.* -->
      <e><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="det"/><a/><j/></i><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="adj"/><j/></i><re>[A-Za-z]+</re><i><s n="n"/><a/><j/></i></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="take out">
      <p><l>take<s n="vblex"/><a/><j/></l><r>take<g><b/>out</g><s n="vblex"/><a/><j/></r></p>
      <par n="SN"/>
      <p><l>out<s n="adv"/></l><r></r></p>
    </e>
    <e lm="take out of">
      <p><l>take<s n="vblex"/><a/><j/></l><r>take<g><b/>out</g><s n="vblex"/><a/><j/></r></p>
      <par n="SN"/>
      <p><l>out<b/>of<s n="pr"/></l><r>of<s n="pr"/></r></p>
    </e>
    <e lm="pick up">
      <p><l>pick<s n="vblex"/><a/><j/></l><r>pick<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/><a/><j/></r></p>
      <par n="SN"/>
      <p><l>up<s n="adv"/></l><r></r></p>
    </e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
